Hawaii, session 2026, GM1230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. Section 20IH-181, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
3 "(b) The sales price shall be established at the beginning
4 of the rental term and shall remain fixed for [the first five
5 years] a period of up to ten years after the rental agreement is
6 executed. During this period, the participant shall have the
7 option of purchasing the unit at the designated sales price. If
8 the participant does not elect to purchase the unit within the
9 [five-year] option period, the renter shall forfeit the right to
10 continue living in the unit and the unit shall be made available
11 to another purchaser or renter."
12 SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
13 and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
14 SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3357 HB1711 CDl HMSO
1

H.B. NO. JS’i
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 24th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1711, HD 1,SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B.No. 1711,H.D. 1,S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
101-26